Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-9402
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Insurance Regulatory Sandbox Act is to create a regulatory sandbox program under the Department of Insurance which allows a participant to temporarily test innovative insurance products or services on a limited basis without otherwise being licensed or authorized to act under the laws of the state.

Laws 2023, LB92, § 89.